Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 2
ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

7-80-807. Grounds for administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2271, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 1463, § 194, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-80-808. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2272, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 946, § 22, effective July 1; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1463, § 195, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.